Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4019
Board; cooperate with University of Nebraska and other organizations; purpose.

The board shall not set up research or development units or agencies of its own, but shall limit its activity to cooperation and contracts with the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, and other proper local, state, or national organizations, public or private, in carrying out the purposes of sections 2-4001 to 2-4020.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 19.